South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 23-31-215(N) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (N)(1) Valid out-of-state permits to carry concealable weapons held by a resident of a reciprocal state must be honored by this State, provided, that the reciprocal state requires an applicant to successfully pass a criminal background check and a course in firearm training and safety. A resident of a reciprocal state carrying a concealable weapon in South Carolina is subject to and must abide by the laws of South Carolina regarding concealable weapons. SLED shall maintain and publish a list of those states as the states with which South Carolina has reciprocity. (2) Notwithstanding the reciprocity requirements of item (1), South Carolina shall automatically recognize concealed weapon permits issued by Georgia and North Carolina. (3) The reciprocity provisions of this section shall not be construed to authorize the holder of any out-of-state permit or license to carry, in this State, any firearm or weapon other than a handgun. SECTION 2.  Section 23-31-215(P) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (P) Upon renewal, aA permit issued pursuant to this article is valid for five years. Subject to subsection (Q), SLED shall renew a currently valid permit upon: automatically issue a renewed permit to a permit holder at no cost as soon as is practicable prior to a permit's expiration date if it determines the permit holder has a valid South Carolina driver's license and a state and federal background check on the permit holder is favorable. A permit that is automatically renewed must use the information and photograph of the permit holder that is on the permit holder's driver's license, and it must be mailed to the address on the driver's license. Subject to subsection (Q), a permit that is not automatically renewed shall be renewed at no cost upon: (1) payment of a fifty-dollar renewal fee by the applicant. This fee must be waived for disabled veterans and retired law enforcement officers; (2)(1) completion of the renewal application;  and (3)(2) picture identification or facsimile copy thereof. SECTION 3.  Section 23-31-215(S) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (S) At least thirty days before a permit issued pursuant to this article expires, SLED shall notify the permit holder by mail or online if permitted by subsection (H) at the permit holder's address of record, or online if permitted by subsection (H), that the permit is set to expire along with notification of the permit holder's opportunity to renew the permit pursuant to the provisions of subsections (P) and (Q). The notification in this subsection is not required to be sent to the holder of a permit that will be automatically renewed. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----